Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 8. Duties and Powers of Trustee
§ 814.
Discretionary powers; tax savings.

Notwithstanding the breadth of discretion granted to a trustee in the terms of the trust, including the use of such terms as “absolute,” “sole,” or “uncontrolled,” the trustee shall exercise a discretionary power in good faith and in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, and unless the terms of the trust expressly indicate that a rule in this subsection does not apply:

a person other than a settlor who is a beneficiary and trustee of a trust that confers on the trustee a power to make discretionary distributions to or for the trustee’s personal benefit may exercise the power only in accordance with an ascertainable standard; and

a trustee may not exercise a power to make discretionary distributions to satisfy a legal obligation of support that the trustee personally owes another person.

A power whose exercise is limited or prohibited by subsection (b) of this section may be exercised by a majority of the remaining trustees whose exercise of the power is not so limited or prohibited. If the power of all trustees is so limited or prohibited, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint a special fiduciary with authority to exercise the power.

Subsection (b) of this section does not apply to:

a power held by the settlor’s spouse who is the trustee of a trust for which a marital deduction, as defined in § 2056(b)(5) or 2523(e) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on the effective date of this title, was previously allowed;

any trust during any period that the trust may be revoked or amended by its settlor; or

a trust if contributions to the trust qualify for the annual exclusion under § 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on the effective date of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.

§ 815.
General powers of trustee.

A trustee, without authorization by the Probate Division of the Superior Court, may exercise:

powers conferred by the terms of the trust; and

except as limited by the terms of the trust:

all powers over the trust property which an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property;

any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper investment, management, and distribution of the trust property; and

any other powers conferred by this title.

The exercise of a power is subject to the fiduciary duties prescribed by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.

§ 816.
Specific powers of trustee.

Without limiting the authority conferred by § 815 of this title, a trustee may:

collect trust property and accept or reject additions to the trust property from a settlor or any other person;

acquire or sell property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale;

exchange, partition, or otherwise change the character of trust property;

deposit trust money in an account in a regulated financial service institution;

borrow money, with or without security, and mortgage or pledge trust property for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

with respect to an interest in a proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, corporation, or other form of business or enterprise, continue the business or other enterprise and take any action that may be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners, including merging, dissolving, or otherwise changing the form of business organization or contributing additional capital;

with respect to stocks or other securities, exercise the rights of an absolute owner, including the right to:

vote, or give proxies to vote, with or without power of substitution, or enter into or continue a voting trust agreement;

hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the trust so that title may pass by delivery;

pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable or accruing against the securities, and sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; and

deposit the securities with a depositary or other regulated financial service institution;

with respect to an interest in real property, construct, or make ordinary or extraordinary repairs to, alterations to, or improvements in, buildings or other structures, demolish improvements, raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings, subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use or grant public or private easements, and make or vacate plats and adjust boundaries;

enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee, including a lease or other arrangement for exploration and removal of natural resources, with or without the option to purchase or renew, for a period within or extending beyond the duration of the trust;

grant an option involving a sale, lease, or other disposition of trust property or acquire an option for the acquisition of property, including an option exercisable beyond the duration of the trust, and exercise an option so acquired;

insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and insure the trustee, the trustee’s agents, and beneficiaries against liability arising from the administration of the trust;

abandon or decline to administer property of no value or of insufficient value to justify its collection or continued administration;

with respect to possible liability for violation of environmental law:

inspect or investigate property the trustee holds or has been asked to hold or property owned or operated by an organization in which the trustee holds or has been asked to hold an interest for the purpose of determining the application of environmental law with respect to the property;

take action to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or potential violation of any environmental law affecting property held directly or indirectly by the trustee, whether taken before or after the assertion of a claim or the initiation of governmental enforcement;

decline to accept property into trust or disclaim any power with respect to property that is or may be burdened with liability for violation of environmental law;

compromise claims against the trust which may be asserted for an alleged violation of environmental law; and

pay the expense of any inspection, review, abatement, or remedial action to comply with environmental law;

pay or contest any claim, settle a claim by or against the trust, and release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the trust;

pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the trustee and of employees and agents of the trust, and other expenses incurred in the administration of the trust;

exercise elections with respect to federal, state, and local taxes;

select a mode of payment under any employee benefit or retirement plan or account, annuity, or life insurance payable to the trustee, exercise rights thereunder, including exercise of the right to indemnification for expenses and against liabilities, and take appropriate action to collect the proceeds;

make loans out of trust property, including loans to a beneficiary on terms and conditions the trustee considers to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances, and the trustee has a lien on future distributions for repayment of those loans;

pledge trust property to guarantee loans made by others to the beneficiary;

appoint a trustee to act in another jurisdiction with respect to trust property located in the other jurisdiction, confer upon the appointed trustee all of the powers and duties of the appointing trustee, require that the appointed trustee furnish security, and remove any trustee so appointed;

pay an amount distributable to a beneficiary who is under a legal disability or who the trustee reasonably believes is incapacitated, by paying it directly to the beneficiary or applying it for the beneficiary’s benefit, or by:

paying it to the beneficiary’s guardian of the property or, if the beneficiary does not have a guardian of the property, the beneficiary’s guardian of the person;

paying it to the beneficiary’s custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, and, for that purpose, creating a custodianship; or

managing it as a separate fund on the beneficiary’s behalf, subject to the beneficiary’s continuing right to withdraw the distribution;

on distribution of trust property or the division or termination of a trust, make distributions in divided or undivided interests, allocate particular assets in proportionate or disproportionate shares, value the trust property for those purposes, and adjust for resulting differences in valuation;

resolve a dispute concerning the interpretation of the trust or its administration by mediation, arbitration, or other procedure for alternative dispute resolution;

prosecute or defend an action, claim, or judicial proceeding in any jurisdiction to protect trust property and the trustee in the performance of the trustee’s duties;

sign and deliver contracts and other instruments that are useful to achieve or facilitate the exercise of the trustee’s powers; and

on termination of the trust, exercise the powers appropriate to wind up the administration of the trust and distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section enumerates specific powers commonly included in trust instruments and in trustee powers legislation. All the powers listed are subject to alteration in the terms of the trust.
See
Section 105. The powers listed are also subsumed under the general authority granted in Subdivision 815(a)(2) to exercise all powers over the trust property which an unmarried competent owner has over individually owned property, and any other powers appropriate to achieve the proper management, investment, and distribution of the trust property. The powers listed add little of substance not already granted by Section 815 and powers conferred elsewhere in the Code, which are listed in the Comment to Section 815. While the Committee drafting this Code discussed dropping the list of specific powers, it concluded that the demand of third parties to see language expressly authorizing specific transactions justified retention of a detailed list.

As provided in Subsection 815(b), the exercise of a power is subject to fiduciary duties except as modified in the terms of the trust. The fact that the trustee has a power does not imply a duty that the power must be exercised.

Many of the powers listed in this section are similar to the powers listed in Section 3 of the Uniform Trustees’ Powers Act (1964). Several are new, however, and other powers drawn from that Act have been updated. The powers enumerated in this section may be divided into categories. Certain powers, such as the powers to acquire or sell property, borrow money, and deal with real estate, securities, and business interests, are powers that any individual can exercise. Other powers, such as the power to collect trust property, are by their very nature only applicable to trustees. Other specific powers, particularly those listed in other sections of the Uniform Trust Code, modify a trustee duty that would otherwise apply.
See, e.g.
, Subsections 802(h) (exceptions to duty of loyalty) and 810(d) (joint investments as exception to earmarking requirement).

Subdivision (1) authorizes a trustee to collect trust property and collect or decline additions to the trust property. The power to collect trust property is an incident of the trustee’s duty to administer the trust as provided in Section 801. The trustee has a duty to enforce claims as provided in Section 811, the successful prosecution of which can result in collection of trust property. Pursuant to Section 812, the trustee also has a duty to collect trust property from a former trustee or other person holding trust property. For an application of the power to reject additions to the trust property, see Subdivision 816(13) (power to decline property with possible environmental liability).

Subdivision (2) authorizes a trustee to sell trust property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale. Under the Restatement, a power of sale is implied unless limited in the terms of the trust. Restatement (Third) of Trusts: Prudent Investor Rule Section 190 (1992). In arranging a sale, a trustee must comply with the duty to act prudently as provided in Section 804. This duty may dictate that the sale be made with security.

Subdivision (4) authorizes a trustee to deposit funds in an account in a regulated financial-service institution. This includes the right of a financial institution trustee to deposit funds in its own banking department as authorized by Subdivision 802(h)(4).

Subdivision (5) authorizes a trustee to borrow money. Under the Restatement, the sole limitation on such borrowing is the general obligation to invest prudently.
See
Restatement (Third) of Trusts: Prudent Investor Rule Section 191 (1992). Language clarifying that the loan may extend beyond the duration of the trust was added to negate an older view that the trustee only had power to encumber the trust property for the period that the trust was in existence.

Subdivision (6) authorizes the trustee to continue, contribute additional capital to, or change the form of a business. Any such decision by the trustee must be made in light of the standards of prudent investment stated in Article 9.

Subdivision (7), regarding powers with respect to securities, codifies and amplifies the principles of Restatement (Second) of Trusts Section 193 (1959).

Subdivision (9), authorizing the leasing of property, negates the older view, reflected in Restatement (Second) of Trusts Section 189 cmt. c (1959), that a trustee could not lease property beyond the duration of the trust. Whether a longer term lease is appropriate is judged by the standards of prudence applicable to all investments.

Subdivision (10), authorizing a trustee to grant options with respect to sales, leases or other dispositions of property, negates the older view, reflected in Restatement (Second) of Trusts Section 190 cmt. k (1959), that a trustee could not grant another person an option to purchase trust property. Like any other investment decision, whether the granting of an option is appropriate is a question of prudence under the standards of Article 9.

Subdivision (11), authorizing a trustee to purchase insurance, empowers a trustee to implement the duty to protect trust property.
See
Section 809. The trustee may also insure beneficiaries, agents, and the trustee against liability, including liability for breach of trust.

Subdivision (13) is one of several provisions in the Uniform Trust Code designed to address trustee concerns about possible liability for violations of environmental law. This Subdivision collects all the powers relating to environmental concerns in one place even though some of the powers, such as the powers to pay expenses, compromise claims, and decline property, overlap with other subdivisions of this section (decline property, subdivision (1); compromise claims, subdivision (14); pay expenses, subdivision (15)). Numerous States have legislated on the subject of environmental liability of fiduciaries. For a representative state statute, see Tex. Prop. Code Ann. Section 113.025.
See also
Subdivision 701(c)(2) (designated trustee may inspect property to determine potential violation of environmental or other law or for any purpose) and subsection 1010(b) (trustee not personally liable for violation of environmental law arising from ownership or control of trust property).

Subdivision (14) authorizes a trustee to pay, contest, settle, or release claims. Section 811 requires that a trustee need take only “reasonable” steps to enforce claims, meaning that a trustee may release a claim not only when it is uncollectible, but also when collection would be uneconomic.
See
Restatement (Second) of Trusts Section 192 (1959) (power to compromise, arbitrate and abandon claims).

Subdivision (15), among other things, authorizes a trustee to pay compensation to the trustee and agents without prior approval of court. Regarding the standard for setting trustee compensation, see Section 708.
See also
Section 709 (repayment of trustee expenditures). While prior court approval is not required, Subdivision 813(b)(4) requires the trustee to inform the qualified beneficiaries in advance of a change in the method or rate of compensation.

Subdivision (16) authorizes a trustee to make elections with respect to taxes. The Uniform Trust Code leaves to other law the issue of whether the trustee, in making such elections, must make compensating adjustments in the beneficiaries’ interests.

Subdivision (17) authorizes a trustee to take action with respect to employee benefit or retirement plans, or annuities or life insurance payable to the trustee. Typically, these will be beneficiary designations which the settlor has made payable to the trustee, but this Code also allows the trustee to acquire ownership of annuities or life insurance.

Subdivisions (18) and (19) allow a trustee to make loans to a beneficiary or to guarantee loans of a beneficiary upon such terms and conditions as the trustee considers fair and reasonable. The determination of what is fair and reasonable must be made in light of the fiduciary duties of the trustee and the purposes of the trust. Frequently, a trustee will make loans to a beneficiary which might be considered less than prudent in an ordinary commercial sense although of great benefit to the beneficiary and which help carry out the trust purposes. If the trustee requires security for the loan to the beneficiary, adequate security under this paragraph may consist of a charge on the beneficiary’s interest in the trust.
See
Restatement (Second) of Trusts Section 255 (1959). However, the interest of a beneficiary subject to a spendthrift restraint may not be pledged as security for a loan.

See

Section 502.

Subdivision (20) authorizes the appointment of ancillary trustees in jurisdictions in which the regularly appointed trustee is unable or unwilling to act. Normally, an ancillary trustee will be appointed only when there is a need to manage real estate located in another jurisdiction. This paragraph allows the regularly appointed trustee to select the ancillary trustee and to confer on the ancillary trustee such powers and duties as may be necessary. The appointment of ancillary trustees is a topic which a settlor may wish to address in the terms of the trust.

Subdivision (21) authorizes a trustee to make payments to another person for the use or benefit of a beneficiary who is under a legal disability or who the trustee reasonably believes is incapacitated. Although an adult relative or other person receiving funds is required to spend it on the beneficiary’s behalf, it is preferable that the trustee make the distribution to a person having more formal fiduciary responsibilities. For this reason, payment may be made to an adult relative only if the trustee does not know of a conservator, guardian, custodian, or custodial trustee capable of acting for the beneficiary.

Subdivision (22) authorizes a trustee to make non-pro-rata distributions and allocate particular assets in proportionate or disproportionate shares. This power provides needed flexibility and lessens the risk that a non-pro-rata distribution will be treated as a taxable sale.

Subdivision (23) authorizes a trustee to resolve disputes through mediation, arbitration or other methods of alternate dispute resolution. The drafters of this Code encourage the use of such alternate methods for resolving disputes. Arbitration is a form of nonjudicial settlement agreement authorized by Section 111. In representing beneficiaries and others in connection with arbitration or in approving settlements obtained through mediation or other methods of ADR, the representation principles of Article 3 may be applied. Settlors wishing to encourage use of alternate dispute resolution may draft to provide it. For sample language, see American Arbitration Association, Arbitration Rules for Wills and Trusts (1995).

Subdivision (24) authorizes a trustee to prosecute or defend an action. As to the propriety of reimbursement for attorney’s fees and other expenses of an action or judicial proceeding, see Section 709 and Comment.
See also
Section 811 (duty to defend actions).

Subdivision (26), which is similar to Section 344 of the Restatement (Second) of Trusts (1959), clarifies that even though the trust has terminated, the trustee retains the powers needed to wind up the administration of the trust and distribute the remaining trust property.

§ 817.
Distribution upon termination.

Upon termination or partial termination of a trust, the trustee may send to the beneficiaries a proposal for distribution. The right of any beneficiary to object to the proposed distribution terminates if the beneficiary does not notify the trustee of an objection within 30 days after the proposal was sent but only if the proposal informed the beneficiary of the right to object and of the time allowed for objection.

Upon the occurrence of an event terminating or partially terminating a trust, the trustee shall proceed expeditiously to distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it, subject to the right of the trustee to retain a reasonable reserve for the payment of debts, expenses, and taxes.

A release by a beneficiary of a trustee from liability for breach of trust is invalid to the extent:

it was induced by improper conduct of the trustee; or

the beneficiary, at the time of the release, did not know of the beneficiary’s rights or of the material facts relating to the breach.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section contains several independent provisions governing distribution upon termination. Other provisions of the Uniform Trust Code relevant to distribution upon termination include Section 816(26) (powers upon termination to windup administration and distribution), and 1005 (limitation of action against trustee).

Subsection (a) is based on Section 3-906(b) of the Uniform Probate Code. It addresses the dilemma that sometimes arises when the trustee is reluctant to make distribution until the beneficiary approves but the beneficiary is reluctant to approve until the assets are in hand. The procedure made available under subsection (a) facilitates the making of non-pro-rata distributions. However, whenever practicable it is normally better practice to obtain the advance written consent of the beneficiaries to a proposed plan of distribution. Similar to other notices under the Code, the right of a beneficiary to object may be barred by delivery of the proposal to another person if that other person may represent and bind the beneficiary as provided in Article 3.

The failure of a beneficiary to object to a plan of distribution pursuant to subsection (a) is not a release as provided in subsection (c) or Section 1009. A release requires an affirmative act by a beneficiary and is not accomplished upon a mere failure to object. Furthermore, a failure of a beneficiary to object does not preclude the beneficiary from bringing an action with respect to matters not disclosed in the proposal for distribution.

Subsection (b) recognizes that upon an event terminating or partially terminating a trust, expeditious distribution should be encouraged to the extent reasonable under the circumstances. However, a trustee is entitled to retain a reasonable reserve for payment of debts, expenses, and taxes. Sometimes these reserves must be quite large, for example, upon the death of the beneficiary of a QTIP trust that is subject to federal estate tax in the beneficiary’s estate. Not infrequently, a substantial reserve must be retained until the estate tax audit is concluded several years after the beneficiary’s death.

Subsection (c) is an application of Section 1009. Section 1009 addresses the validity of any type of release that a beneficiary might give. Subsection (c) is more limited, dealing only with releases given upon termination of the trust. Factors affecting the validity of a release include adequacy of disclosure, whether the beneficiary had a legal incapacity and was not represented under Article 3, and whether the trustee engaged in any improper conduct. See Restatement (Second) of Trusts Section 216 (1959).

Comment Amended in 2005.